Utah statutes.
13-2-3.   Employment of personnel -- Compensation of director.

(1) The director, with the approval of the executive director, may employ personnel necessary to carry out the duties and responsibilities of the division at salaries established by the executive director according to standards established by the Department of Administrative Services.

(2)  The executive director shall establish the salary of the director according to standards established by the Department of Administrative Services.

(3)  The director may employ specialists, technical experts, or investigators to participate or assist in investigations if they reasonably require expertise beyond that normally required for division personnel.

(4)  An investigator employed pursuant to Subsection (3) may be designated a special function officer, as defined in Section 53-13-105, by the director, but is not eligible for retirement benefits under the Public Safety Employee's Retirement System.



Amended by Chapter 21, 1999 General Session

